Tennessee, session 114, HB1702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations
(TACIR) is directed to perform a study of this state's emergency communications system.
SECTION 2. The study required by Section 1 must include:
(1) An analysis of the current funding model for emergency communications
systems in this state, and a comparison of the funding models of other states;
(2) An analysis of the different operating structures of emergency
communications districts (ECDs), along with the benefits or disadvantages of each;
(3) An organizational chart of all ECDs from leadership down to the public safety
answering points (PSAPs);
(4) Methods to increase operational and financial consistency and uniformity of
all ECDs in this state;
(5) A discussion regarding the consolidation of ECDs and analysis of ECD call
sharing, particularly in rural areas;
(6) The rationale behind maintaining multiple ECDs and whether a uniform,
statewide system would be beneficial;
(7) An analysis of requiring direct dispatch protocol at all PSAPs; and
(8) Any other related topic TACIR finds would be of interest to the general
assembly, along with recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 3. TACIR shall file the completed study with the speaker of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives on or before December 1, 2026.
HB1702
009997
- 1 -

SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009997